District of Columbia statutes.
42-1106

Repealed

No recordation until return filed and tax paid; deeds evidencing transfer of economic interest in real property in District.

Repealed.

Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 13, Pub. L. 87-408, title III, § 306
Sept. 9, 1989, D.C. Law 8-20, § 2(e), 36 DCR 4564
June 14, 1994, D.C. Law 10-128, § 101(g), 41 DCR 2096
May 5, 1995, D.C. Law 11-9, § 2, 42 DCR 1173
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 9(d), 50 DCR 896

Application of Law 8-20: See Historical and Statutory and Historical Notes following § 42-1101.

Application of Law 10-128: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-1101.

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 10(f) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 10(f) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 10(f) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 10(f) of the Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-228, Mar. 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).
Temporary Repeal of Section For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 10(f) of the Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, Oct. 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
1973 Ed., § 45-726.
1981 Ed., § 45-926.